Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1211.
do enact as follows:AB1211,11Section 1. 20.155 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB1211,2,3220.155 (3) (c) Municipal public utility grants. A sum sufficient for the 3municipal public utility grants awarded under s. 197.11.AB1211,24Section 2. 197.11 of the statutes is created to read:AB1211,2,155197.11 Municipal public utility grants. (1) The commission shall award 6a grant as provided under this section to any municipality in this state that, for the 7purpose of owning and operating a public utility, seeks to construct and operate a 8plant or equipment under s. 197.01 (1), to purchase a public utility or any part 9thereof under s. 197.01 (2), or to acquire the property of any public utility under s. 10197.01 (3) and has secured from the commission a certificate of public convenience 11and necessity to construct, own, operate, manage, or control any plant or equipment 12for the production, transmission, delivery, or furnishing of heat, light, water, or 13power. A municipality may apply to the commission for a grant under this section 14in a manner and form determined by the commission and shall submit with the 15application all information requested by the commission.AB1211,2,1716(2) The commission shall award a grant under this section in the amount of 1750 percent of the costs of the construction or acquisition under sub. (1). AB1211,2,1818